Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 22. Motor Vehicle Title Loans.
§ 6.2-2222.
Fines for violations.

In addition to the authority conferred under §§

6.2-2219

and

6.2-2220

, the Commission may impose a fine or penalty not exceeding $1,000 upon any person who it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules of Practice and Procedure, has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations promulgated by the Commission pursuant thereto, or violated any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of a licensee’s business. For the purposes of this section, each separate violation shall be subject to the fine or penalty herein prescribed and, in the case of a violation of §

6.2-2201

, each loan made or arranged shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-502.

§ 6.2-2223.
Criminal penalty.

Any person violating §

6.2-2201

shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. For the purposes of this section, each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-503.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 6.2-2224.
Validity of noncompliant loan agreement; private right of action.

If any provision of a motor vehicle title loan agreement violates a requirement of this chapter, such provision shall be unenforceable against the borrower.

Any person who suffers loss by reason of a violation of any provision of this chapter may bring a civil action to enforce such provision. Any person who is successful in such action shall recover reasonable attorney fees, expert witness fees, and court costs incurred by bringing such action.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-504; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added subsection B.

§ 6.2-2225.
Application of chapter to Internet loans.

The provisions of this chapter, including specifically the licensure requirements of §

6.2-2201

, shall apply to persons making motor vehicle title loans over the Internet to Virginia residents or any individuals in Virginia, whether or not the person making the loan maintains a physical presence in the Commonwealth.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-505; 2011, c. 418.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 418 inserted “or any individuals in Virginia.”

§ 6.2-2226.
Authority of Attorney General; referral by Commission to Attorney General.

If the Commission determines that a person is in violation of, or has violated, any provision of this chapter, the Commission may refer the information to the Attorney General and may request that the Attorney General investigate such violations. With or without such referral, the Attorney General is hereby authorized to seek to enjoin violations of this chapter. The circuit court having jurisdiction may enjoin such violations notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law.

The Attorney General may also seek, and the circuit court may order or decree, damages and such other relief allowed by law, including restitution to the extent available to borrowers under applicable law. Persons entitled to any relief as authorized by this section shall be identified by order of the court within 180 days from the date of the order permanently enjoining the unlawful act or practice.

In any action brought by the Attorney General by virtue of the authority granted in this section, the Attorney General shall be entitled to seek reasonable attorney fees and costs.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-506; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and in subsection A, substituted “With or without” for “In the case of” in the second sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “The Attorney General” for “Upon such referral of the Commission, the Attorney General” in the first sentence.

§ 6.2-2227.
Violation of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act.

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice in accordance with § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to any and all of the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.).

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-507.